src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Morphology
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF THE Moksha LANGUAGE.

The morphological analyses of wordforms of the Moksha language are presented
in this system in terms of following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).
+TYÄ 	 Underdeveloped.

The parts-of-speech tags are:

* **+A**:  adjective
* **+Adv**:  adverb
* **+CS**:  subordinating conjunction
* **+CC**:  coordinating conjunction
* **+Det**:  Determiner
* **+Interj**:  interjection
* **+N**:  noun
* **+Pcle**:  particle
* **+Po**:  postposition
* **+Pron**:  pronoun
* **+Qnt**:  Quantifier
* **+V**:  verb

* **+Descr**:  descriptive
* **+MWE**:  Multiword element
The parts of speech are further split up into:
**Nouns:**
* **+Prop**:  proper
* **+CollN**:  used with paired nouns **collective nouns**
* **+Relat**:  relator nouns, mainly meronyms 
**Pronouns:**
* **+Dem**:  demonstrative
* **+Indef**:  indefinite
* **+Dep**:  dependent word requiring the presence of another, e.g. **мень**
* **+Exclusive**:  ськамонза
* **+Intensive**:  intensive pronoun
* **+Interr**:  interrogative
* **+PerifMod**:  periferal modifier ськамонза, кавонест
* **+Pers**:  personal
* **+Recipr**:  reciprocal
* **+Recip**:  reciprocal
* **+Refl**:  reflexive
* **+Rel**:  relative
personal pronouns use additional tags:
```
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3 
```
Adverbs:
* ** +Adv-Ideoph 	: These are ideophonic descriptors used to modify the verb**: 
*вырк ливтясь*  "**flit** and it flew off"
* ; +Deg 	     : This is degree, depricate + AdA
* ** +Manner     **:  with reference to type of adverb
* ** +Spat 	     **:  spatial
* ** +Temp 	     **:  temporal
* ** +Emphatic   **:  used with negation particles афи, 
* **+EvidNfh**:  кле

Interjections:
* ** +Formulaic  **:  greetings,
The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
* ** +Err/Orth    **:  substandard / outside the written norm
* +Err/Orth-lowered-final-e-2-ja final е lowered to я with Е2Я trigger
* +Err/Orth-soft-loss $тиендсазь €тиендьсазь
* +Err/Orth-soft-kept шяярьня
* +Err/Orth-t-d наротта should be народта, кядьта
* +Err/Orth-colloq Евсеич
* +Err/Orth-glide-final Толстойнь, 
* +Err/Orth-old1 * old1 like озимь, морковь 1930–1940
* +Err/Orth-pre1978 * orthography preceding 1978
* +Err/Orth-pre2012 * previous orthography

* _+Use/Marg_ * Marginal
* _+Use/-Spell_ * Exclude from speller
* _+Use/SpellNoSugg_ * recognized but not suggested in speller
* _+Use/Colloq_ * Брыжинский >> Брыжинскяй
* _+Use/Circ_ * Circular path
* _+Use/CircN_ * Circular number path
* _+Use/-Ped_ * Remove from pedagogical speller
* _+Use/NG_ * Do not generate, for isme-ped.fst and apertium
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser

* _+Err/Dial_ * The form is non-standard although it may well be central dialect, e.g. стякшемс
* _+Err/Lex_ * The lemma is not a Moksha word

* +URL * For tagging URLs

# Dialect tags
* +Dial * No specification
Specific to some dialects
* +Dial/-C * Not central standard

The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
* ** +Sg 		**:  singular
* ** +Pl 		**:  plural
* ** +SP 		**:  both singular and plural
* ** +Abe 		**:  abessive
* ** +Abl 		**:  ablative
* ** +Acc 		**:  accusative Not really necessary
* ** +Cau 		**:  causatative
* ** +Com 		**:  comitative -нек
* ** +Cmpr 		**:  comparative -шка
* ** +Dat 		**:  dative
* ** +Ela 		**:  elative
* ** +Gen 		**:  genitive
* ** +Ill 		**:  illative
* ** +Ine 		**:  inessive
* ** +Lat 		**:  lative
* ** +Loc 		**:  locative
* ** +Nom 		**:  nominative
* ** +Prl 		**:  prolative
* ** +Tra 		**:  translative
* ** +Voc 		**:  Vocative

The possession is marked as such:
* ** +PxSg1 	**:  first person singular
* ** +PxSg2 	**:  second person singular
* ** +PxSg3 	**:  third person singular
* ** +PxPl1 	**:  first person plural
* ** +PxPl2 	**:  second person plural
* ** +PxPl3 	**:  third person plural

* ** +Def 	**:  Definite
The comparative forms are:
* ** +Comp 		**:  comparative as opposed to superlative
* ** +Superl 	**:  superlative

Particles
* **+Epist		**:  epistemic
Quantifiers and Numerals are classified under:
* ** +Num 		**:  numeral
* ** +Arab	**:  arabic numeral
* ** +Appr 		**:  Approximative numeral кафта-колма, колмошка "two or three" requires split?
* ** +AssocColl **:  -ne- ; avide-; -месть
* ** +Coll 		**:  Collective
* ** +Card 		**:  cardinal
* ** +Distr 	**:  Distributive
* _+Iter_ Iterative This will be replaced by +Mult
* _+Mult_ Multiplicative form expressing number of times; myv: `кавксть`, kpv: `кыкысь`
* ** +Ord 		**:  ordinal
* ** +Cmpos		**:  compositional numeral 14, 24, 34, 44 нилие, 
* ** +Attr 		**:  attribute, premodifier
* ** +Span		**:  this must be n-dash in numbers

Verb voice:
* ** +Act 	**:  active
* ** +Pss 	**:  passive
Verb moods are:
* ** +Cond 	**:  conditional ндяря- protasis
* ** +NegCnd **:  negative conditional Офтяря- negative protasis
* ** +NegCndSub **:  negative conditional Офтяряль negative protasis
* ** +Conj 	**:  conjunctional "Оль"
* ** +Des 	**:  desiderative ксоль "was about to; wanted to"
* ** +Ind 	**:  indicative
* ** +Imprt **:  imperative
* ** +Opt 	**:  optative
* ** +Prec  **:  Precative mood is a directive mood that signals that the utterance is a request. imperative + additional vowel and cons -ака forms equal Precative

Verb tenses are
 +Prs 	 present and future ! nominal	conjugation as well
 +Prt1 	 preterite I ! only finite verbal
 +Prt2 	 preterite II ! nominal conjugation as well

Verb personal forms are:

 +ScSg1 	 subject conjugation first person singular
 +ScSg2 	 subject conjugation second person singular
 +ScSg3 	 subject conjugation third person singular
 +ScPl1 	 subject conjugation first person plural
 +ScPl2 	 subject conjugation second person plural
 +ScPl3 	 subject conjugation third person plural

 +OcSg1 	 objject conjugation first person singular
 +OcSg2 	 objject conjugation second person singular
 +OcSg3 	 objject conjugation third person singular
 +OcPl1 	 objject conjugation first person plural
 +OcPl2 	 objject conjugation second person plural
 +OcPl3 	 objject conjugation third person plural

Other verb forms are
  +ConNeg 	 connegative, main verb complement to Neg, vowel-stem
  +ConNegII 	 connegative, main verb complement to Neg, cons-stem
  +Ger 	 gerund This is used with Der/Озь and VAbl
  +Inf    	 infinitive
  +Neg    	 verb of negation эзь, аволь, иля
  +Aux		 auxiliary verb
  +Nec		 necessative/obligatory in -Ома
+Prc 	 participle
  +VGen   	 Verb Genitive, genitive form participle
  +VAbl   	 Verb Ablative "озадо"

 +ABBR 	 Abbreviation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
 +ACR  	 Acronym

Special symbols are classified with:

The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 +TV 	 transitive verb
 +IV 	 intransitive verb
Special multiword units are analysed with:
Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:

* +Dig1 
* +Dig2 
* +Dig3 
* +Dig4 
* +Rom Roman numerals

Compounding
* +Cmp Dynamic compound - this tag should always be part of a dynamic compound.
It is important for Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.
* +Cmp/Hyph with nouns
* +Cmp/Hyph-Coll with nouns
* +Cmp/Hyph-Redup with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-Synonym with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-Serial with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-tejems with verbs

Question and Focus particles:
* +Clt/Cop This marks all instances of enclitic copula inflection
* +Clt/Aram Used with preceding dative тейне-арам 'in my opinion'
* +Clt/Add 
* +Clt/AddGA 
* +Clt/AddVok 
* +Clt/AddNgA 
* +Clt/AddJok seems limited to temporal expressions: тяниёк

* +Acc for Russian
* +All for Russian
* +AnIn for Russian animate
* +Anim for Russian
* +Cmpar for Russian
* +Count for Russian
* +Epenth for Russian
* +Imp for Russian imperative
* +Impf for Russian 
* +Inan for Russian	inanimate
* +Ins for Russian
* +Fac for Russian
* +Fem for Russian feminine
* +MFN for Russian
* +Msc for Russian masculine
* +Neu for Russian neuter
* +Perf for Russian
* +PObj for Russian
* +Pos for Russian
* +Prb for Russian
* +Pred for Russian predicate 
* +PrsAct for Russian 
* +Pst for Russian

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* +v1
* +v2
* +v3
* +v4
* +v5
* +v6
* +v7
* +v8
* +v9
* +v10
* +v11
* +v12
* +v13
* +v14
* +v15
* +v16
* +v17
* +v18
* +v19
* +v20
* +v21
* +v22
* +v23
* +v24

* **+Sem/Act** Activity
* **+Sem/Amount** Amount
* **+Sem/Ani** Animate
* **+Sem/Aniprod** Animal Product
* **+Sem/Body** Bodypart
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
* **+Sem/Build** Building
* **+Sem/Build-part** Part of Bulding, like the closet
* **+Sem/Cat** Category
* **+Sem/Clth** Clothes
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** Jewelery
* **+Sem/Clth-part** part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* **+Sem/Ctain** Container
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** Abstract container like bank account
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth**
* **+Sem/Curr** Currency like dollár, Not Money
* **+Sem/Dance** Dance
* **+Sem/Dir** Direction like GPS-kursa
* **+Sem/Domain** Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* **+Sem/Drink** Drink
* **+Sem/Dummytag** Dummytag
* **+Sem/Edu** Educational event
* **+Sem/Event** Event
* **+Sem/Feat** Feature, like Árvu
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Fem** Female name
* **+Sem/Fem-Patr** Female name
* **+Sem/Fem-Sur** Female name
* **+Sem/Food** Food
* **+Sem/Food-med** Medicine
* **+Sem/Furn** Furniture
* **+Sem/Game** Game
* **+Sem/Geom** Geometrical object
* **+Sem/Group** Animal or Human Group
* **+Sem/Hum** Human
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** Human abstract
* **+Sem/Ideol** Ideology
* **+Sem/Lang** Language
* **+Sem/Mal** Male name
* **+Sem/Mal-Patr** Male name
* **+Sem/Mal-Sur** Male name
* **+Sem/Mat** Material for producing things
* **+Sem/Measr** Measure
* **+Sem/Money** Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* **+Sem/Obj** Object
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-el** (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** Object with something written on it
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** flexible ropelike object
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** Surface object
* **+Sem/Org** Organisation
* **+Sem/Part** Feature, oassi, bealli
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** Cognative perception
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** Emotional perception
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Plant** Plant
* **+Sem/Plant-part** Plant part
* **+Sem/Plc** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** Abstract place
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-line** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-water** Place
* **+Sem/Pos** Position (as in social position job)
* **+Sem/Process** Process
* **+Sem/Prod** Product
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** Audio product
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** Cognition product
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** Linguistic product
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** Visual product
* **+Sem/Rel** Relation
* **+Sem/Route** Name of a Route
* **+Sem/Rule** Rule or convention
* **+Sem/Semcon** Semantic concept
* **+Sem/Sign** Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* **+Sem/Sport** Sport
* **+Sem/State** 
* **+Sem/State-sick** Illness
* **+Sem/Substnc** Substance, like Air and Water
* **+Sem/Sur** Surname
* **+Sem/Symbol** Symbol
* **+Sem/Time** Time
* **+Sem/Tool** Prototypical tool for repairing things
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** Tool used for cleaning
* **+Sem/Tool-it** Tool used in IT
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** Tool used for measuring
* **+Sem/Tool-music** Music instrument
* **+Sem/Tool-write** Writing tool
* **+Sem/Txt** Text (girji, lávlla...)
* **+Sem/Veh** Vehicle
* **+Sem/Wpn** Weapon
* **+Sem/Wthr** The Weather or the state of ground

Semantics are classified with
* **+Sem/Kin** Kin term

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.
